Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Chief Medical Examiner and Postmortem Examinations.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5C M.J. Dead Bodies, §§ 1, 5.

§ 32.1-277.
Office of the Chief Medical Examiner; central and district offices and facilities.

The Commissioner shall establish and maintain, for the purpose of conducting medicolegal investigations of deaths and postmortem examinations, an Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, which shall include a central office and facilities and such district offices and facilities in such localities in the Commonwealth as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. The central office and each district office established pursuant to this section shall be under the supervision of the Chief Medical Examiner. Each such office and facility shall have adequate professional, technical, and medical investigative personnel and physical facilities for the conduct of such examinations and investigations as may be authorized or required by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.12; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 741; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 1998, c. 217; 2014, c. 583; 2019, c. 168.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 164, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner of the Department of Health shall convene a work group to develop a plan for establishing a Fetal and Infant Mortality Review Team (the Team) to (i) examine medical, social, and other related information regarding fetal and infant deaths in the Commonwealth to facilitate broad quantitative analyses as well as in-depth qualitative reviews of fetal and infant deaths in the Commonwealth to identify and investigate correlating factors that influence fetal and infant mortality; (ii) develop policy and programmatic recommendations to address the circumstances that may negatively impact fetal and infant health and improve services, systems of care, and resources for women, infants, and families; and (iii) work with communities and partners to implement such policy and programmatic recommendations and create actionable processes of change. Such plan may include:

“1. Methods for collecting information about fetal and infant deaths in the Commonwealth, including the collection of information about fetal deaths occurring after 20 weeks’ gestation and deaths of children under the age of 12 months as feasible, for broad statistical analysis;

“2. Criteria for the selection of deaths for investigation and review;

“3. Criteria for the selection of deaths for which additional voluntary investigation and qualitative review beyond that to which every death selected for review is subject. Such additional investigation and qualitative review may include interviews with biological or adoptive parents, stepparents, or legal guardians of the fetus or infant, members of the family of the fetus or infant, and other persons with information about the fetus or infant; reviews of circumstances and factors surrounding the fetal or infant death; and other investigative research;

“4. Procedures necessary for maintaining necessary confidentiality and security with regard to reviews undertaken by the Team;

“5. A five-year plan for initiation and operation of the Team, which may include (i) identification of necessary staff and equipment, (ii) identification of annual goals for the Team, (iii) provisions for coordination among stakeholders, (iv) identification of sources of funding available to support and sustain the Team, and (v) a proposed annual budget for each year; and

“6. Any recommendations for further study, legislative actions, or implementation of the Team.

“The work group shall be composed of the Chief Medical Examiner, the Director of the Office of Family Health, the State Registrar of Vital Records, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Commissioner of the Department of Social Services, and the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services or their designees, and (a) the Presidents of the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Chapter of the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology, the Virginia Chapter of the American Association of Pediatrics, and the Virginia Affiliate of the American College of Nurse-Midwives, or their designees; (b) the Director of the Virginia Neonatal Perinatal Collaborative or his designee; (c) representatives of community stakeholders such as doulas, local nonprofit organizations, mental health treatment providers, and other community stakeholders; (d) representatives of medical professionals with experience in fetal, infant, or maternal health; and (e) staff and members of such state agencies as may be appropriate.

“The work group shall report its findings and provide the plan to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and Education and Health by December 1, 2021.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 rewrote the first sentence, which read “The Commissioner shall establish and maintain, for medicolegal investigation of deaths and postmortem examinations, a central office and facilities in the City of Richmond and such district offices and facilities in such localities in the Commonwealth as are necessary”; and added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 168 deleted “in the City of Richmond” preceding “and such district offices.”

§ 32.1-278.
Appointment and qualifications of Chief Medical Examiner.

A Chief Medical Examiner, who shall be a forensic pathologist licensed to practice medicine in this Commonwealth, shall be appointed by the Commissioner with the approval of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.10; 1960, c. 366; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-279.
Duties of Chief Medical Examiner; teaching legal medicine.

The Chief Medical Examiner shall carry out the provisions of this article under the direction of the Commissioner. The Chief Medical Examiner may, with the approval of the Commissioner, employ forensic pathologists to serve as Assistant Chief Medical Examiners in the central and district offices established pursuant to §

32.1-277

.

The Chief Medical Examiner and Assistant Chief Medical Examiners shall be available to Virginia Commonwealth University, the University of Virginia, the Eastern Virginia Medical School, and other institutions of higher education providing instruction in health science or law for teaching legal medicine and other subjects related to their duties.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.12; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 741; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 1991, c. 454; 2002, cc. 87, 478; 2014, c. 583.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by c. 87, effective March 4, 2002, and by c. 478, effective April 3, 2002, are identical, and substituted “Eastern Virginia Medical School” for “Medical College of Hampton Roads” in subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsection A, deleted “central and district offices and facilities established as provided in §

32.1-277

shall be under the supervision of the” following “The” and inserted “may, with the approval of the Commissioner, employ forensic pathologists to serve as Assistant Chief Medical Examiners in the central and district offices established pursuant to §

32.1-277

” at the end of the second sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “Assistant Chief Medical Examiners” for “his assistants.”

§ 32.1-280.
Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 583, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-280

, pertaining to Assistant Chief Medical Examiners, derived from Code 1950, § 32-31.13; 1960, c. 366; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-281.
Commissioner may obtain additional services and facilities.

In the investigation of any death or for the performance of any autopsy authorized or required pursuant to this article, the Commissioner may enter into an agreement for the provision of services with a qualified pathologist or consultant, designated by the Chief Medical Examiner, to perform such autopsy or to make such studies and investigations as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the Chief Medical Examiner and may arrange for the use of mortuary facilities. In any case in which the Commissioner enters into an agreement for the provision of services with a qualified pathologist or consultant in accordance with this section, the cost of such services shall be paid out of funds appropriated for such purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.15; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 741; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 1998, c. 217; 2014, c. 583.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 substituted “enter into an agreement for the provision of services with a qualified pathologist or consultant” for “in addition to the central and district office personnel and medical investigators, employ and pay, out of funds appropriated for such purpose, a qualified pathologist” and deleted “pathological” following “make such,” and added the last sentence.

§ 32.1-282.
Medical examiners.

The Chief Medical Examiner may appoint for each county and city one or more medical examiners, who shall be licensed as a doctor of medicine or osteopathic medicine, a physician assistant, or a nurse practitioner in the Commonwealth and appointed as agents of the Commonwealth, to assist the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner with medicolegal death investigations. A physician assistant appointed as a medical examiner shall practice in accordance with § 54.1-2952. A nurse practitioner appointed as a medical examiner shall practice in accordance with § 54.1-2957.

At the request of the Chief Medical Examiner, the Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or their designees, medical examiners may assist the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner with cases requiring medicolegal death investigations in accordance with §

32.1-283

.

The term of each medical examiner appointed, other than an appointment to fill a vacancy, shall begin on the first day of October of the year of appointment. The term of each medical examiner shall be three years; however, an appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.16; 1952, c. 318; 1960, c. 366; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 2014, c. 583; 2015, c. 107; 2017, c. 170; 2018, c. 776; 2022, c. 151.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 107 rewrote subsection A, which read “The Chief Medical Examiner shall appoint for each county and city one or more medical examiners, who shall be licensed to practice medicine in the Commonwealth to assist the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner with medicolegal death investigations.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 170 substituted “may appoint” for “shall appoint” in subsection A; inserted subsection B; redesignated and rewrote as subsection C, former subsection B, which read “Each medical examiner appointed pursuant to subsection A shall take office on the first day of October of the year of appointment. The term of each medical examiner so appointed shall be three years”; and deleted former subsection C, which read: “The Chief Medical Examiner shall fill any medical examiner vacancy for the unexpired term and shall make any necessary temporary appointments.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 776 substituted “practice” for “have a practice agreement with and practice in collaboration with a physician medical examiner” in the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 151 in the second sentence in subsection A, deleted “have a” following “shall” and deleted “agreement with and be under the continuous supervision of a physician medical examiner” following “practice.”

§ 32.1-282.1.
Per diem medicolegal death investigators.

The Chief Medical Examiner may appoint per diem medicolegal death investigators, who shall have knowledge of standards and procedures for medicolegal death investigations, to assist the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner with medicolegal death investigations. Per diem medicolegal death investigators shall be agents of the Commonwealth.

History.

2015, c. 53.

§ 32.1-283.
Investigation of deaths; obtaining consent to removal of organs, etc.; fees.

Upon the death of any person from trauma, injury, violence, poisoning, accident, suicide or homicide, or suddenly when in apparent good health, or when unattended by a physician, or in jail, prison, other correctional institution or in police custody, or who is an individual receiving services in a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, or suddenly as an apparent result of fire, or in any suspicious, unusual or unnatural manner, or the sudden death of any infant the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall be notified by the physician in attendance, hospital, law-enforcement officer, funeral director, or any other person having knowledge of such death. Good faith efforts shall be made by any person or institution having initial custody of the dead body to identify and to notify the next of kin of the decedent. Notification shall include informing the person presumed to be the next of kin that he has a right to have identification of the decedent confirmed without due delay and without being held financially responsible for any procedures performed for the purpose of the identification. Identity of the next of kin, if determined, shall be provided to the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner upon transfer of the dead body.

Upon being notified of a death as provided in subsection A, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall take charge of the dead body and the Chief Medical Examiner shall cause an investigation into the cause and manner of death to be made and a full report, which shall include written findings, to be prepared. In order to facilitate the investigation, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is authorized to inspect and copy the pertinent medical records of the decedent whose death is the subject of the investigation. Full directions as to the nature, character, and extent of the investigation to be made in such cases shall be furnished each medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, together with appropriate forms for the required reports and instructions for their use. The facilities and personnel of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall be made available to any medical examiner investigating a death in accordance with this section. Reports and findings of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall be confidential and shall not under any circumstance be disclosed or made available for discovery pursuant to a court subpoena or otherwise, except as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner from releasing the cause or manner of death or prohibit disclosure of reports or findings to the parties in a criminal case.

A copy of each report pursuant to this section shall be delivered to the appropriate attorney for the Commonwealth and to the appropriate law-enforcement agency investigating the death. A copy of any such report regarding the death of a victim of a traffic accident shall be furnished upon request to the State Police and the Highway Safety Commission. In addition, a copy of any autopsy report concerning an individual receiving services in a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall be delivered to the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and to the State Inspector General. A copy of any autopsy report concerning a prisoner committed to the custody of the Director of the Department of Corrections shall, upon request of the Director of the Department of Corrections, be delivered to the Director of the Department of Corrections. A copy of any autopsy report concerning a prisoner committed to any local correctional facility shall be delivered to the local sheriff or superintendent. Upon request, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall release such autopsy report to the decedent’s attending physician and to the personal representative or executor of the decedent. At the discretion of the Chief Medical Examiner, an autopsy report may be released to the following persons in the following order of priority: (i) the spouse of the decedent, (ii) an adult son or daughter of the decedent, (iii) either parent of the decedent, (iv) an adult sibling of the decedent, (v) any other adult relative of the decedent in order of blood relationship, or (vi) any appropriate health facility quality assurance program.

For each investigation under this article, including the making of the required reports, the medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

shall receive a fee established by the Board within the limitations of appropriations for the purpose. Such fee shall be paid by the Commonwealth if the deceased is not a legal resident of the county or city in which his death occurred. In the event the deceased is a legal resident of the county or city in which his death occurred, such county or city shall be responsible for the fee up to $20. If the deceased is an individual who receives services in a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the fee shall be paid by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

Nothing herein shall be construed to interfere with the autopsy procedure or with the routine obtaining of consent for removal of organs as conducted by surgical teams or others.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-31.17, 32-31.18, 32-31.20; 1950, p. 659; 1952, cc. 318, 705; 1960, c. 366; 1962, c. 366; 1968, c. 431; 1972, cc. 556, 741; 1974, c. 443; 1975, c. 475; 1978, c. 175; 1979, c. 711; 1981, c. 388; 1985, c. 228; 1993, c. 965; 2002, c. 203; 2003, c. 368; 2007, cc. 19, 868; 2008, cc. 287, 433; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2011, cc. 798, 871; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, c. 583.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 798 and 871, cl. 7 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, except that the provisions of the fifth enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 203, in subsection A, inserted “or who is a patient or resident of a state mental health or mental retardation facility” in the first sentence; in subsection C, added the last sentence; and in subsection D, added the last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 368, in the first sentence of subsection C, inserted “to the appropriate law-enforcement agency investigating the death”; and in subsection D, substituted “$20” for “twenty dollars.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 19 substituted “up to $20” for “however, the Commonwealth shall reimburse such county or city to the extent such fee exceeds $20” in the third sentence in subsection D.

The 2007 amendment by c. 868 added the last two sentences in subsection B; and added the last three sentences in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 287 deleted the former last sentence in subsection A, which read: “After identification of the next of kin, the person or institution, or agent of such person or institution, having custody of the dead body shall attempt to obtain consent for removal of the pituitary or other organs, glands, eyes or tissues for use in transplants or therapy.”

The 2008 amendment by c. 433, in subsection A, in the second sentence inserted “and to notify” preceding “the next of kin” and deleted “and such identity, if determined, shall be provided to the Chief Medical Examiner upon transfer of the dead body,” added the third sentence, and deleted the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subsections C and D.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 798 and 871 are identical, effective July 1, 2012, and substituted “State Inspector General” for “Inspector General for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” in the third sentence in subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “an individual receiving services in a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services,” for “a patient or resident of a state mental health or mental retardation facility,” and “18” for “eighteen” in the first sentence of subsection A; substituted “concerning an individual receiving services in a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “concerning a patient or resident of a state mental health or mental retardation facility” in the third sentence of subsection C; and substituted “an individual who receives services in a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services,” for “a patient or resident of a state mental health or mental retardation facility,” in the fourth sentence of subsection D.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsection A, substituted “the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “less than 18 months of age whose death is suspected to be attributable to Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS), the medical examiner of the county or city in which death occurs” in the first sentence and substituted “such” for “any,” and inserted “initial” in the second sentence, and inserted “Office of the” in the last sentence; rewrote subsection B; in subsection C, inserted “Office of the,” substituted “At” for “or, if no personal representative or executor is appointed, then at,” inserted “an autopsy report may be released”; and in subsection D, inserted “appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

”; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

§ 32.1-283.1.
State Child Fatality Review Team; membership; access to and maintenance of records; confidentiality; etc.

There is hereby created the State Child Fatality Review Team, referred to in this section as “the Team,” which shall develop and implement procedures to ensure that child deaths occurring in Virginia are analyzed in a systematic way. The Team shall review (i) violent and unnatural child deaths, (ii) sudden child deaths occurring within the first 18 months of life, and (iii) those fatalities for which the cause or manner of death was not determined with reasonable medical certainty. No child death review shall be initiated by the Team until conclusion of any law-enforcement investigation or criminal prosecution. The Team shall (i) develop and revise as necessary operating procedures for the review of child deaths, including identification of cases to be reviewed and procedures for coordination among the agencies and professionals involved, (ii) improve the identification, data collection, and record keeping of the causes of child death, (iii) recommend components for prevention and education programs, (iv) recommend training to improve the investigation of child deaths, and (v) provide technical assistance, upon request, to any local child fatality teams that may be established. The operating procedures for the review of child deaths shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision B 17 of §

2.2-4002

.

The 16-member Team shall be chaired by the Chief Medical Examiner and shall be composed of the following persons or their designees: the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; the Director of Child Protective Services within the Department of Social Services; the Superintendent of Public Instruction; the State Registrar of Vital Records; and the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services. In addition, one representative from each of the following entities shall be appointed by the Governor to serve for a term of three years: local law-enforcement agencies, local fire departments, local departments of social services, the Medical Society of Virginia, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Pediatric Society, local emergency medical services personnel, attorneys for the Commonwealth, and community services boards.

Upon the request of the Chief Medical Examiner in his capacity as chair of the Team, made after the conclusion of any law-enforcement investigation or prosecution, information and records regarding a child whose death is being reviewed by the Team may be inspected and copied by the Chief Medical Examiner or his designee, including, but not limited to, any report of the circumstances of the event maintained by any state or local law-enforcement agency or medical examiner, and information or records maintained on such child by any school, social services agency or court. Information, records, or reports maintained by any attorney for the Commonwealth shall be made available for inspection and copying by the Chief Medical Examiner pursuant to procedures which shall be developed by the Chief Medical Examiner and the Commonwealth’s Attorneys’ Services Council established by §

2.2-2617

. Any presentence report prepared pursuant to §

19.2-299

for any person convicted of a crime that led to the death of the child shall be made available for inspection and copying by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner pursuant to procedures which shall be developed by the Chief Medical Examiner. In addition, the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner may inspect and copy from any Virginia health care provider, on behalf of the Team, (i) without obtaining consent, the health and mental health records of the child and those perinatal medical records of the child’s mother that related to such child and (ii) upon obtaining consent from each adult regarding his personal records, or from a parent regarding the records of a minor child, the health and mental health records of the child’s family. All such information and records shall be confidential and shall be excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. Upon the conclusion of the child death review, all information and records concerning the child and the child’s family shall be shredded or otherwise destroyed by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner in order to ensure confidentiality. Such information or records shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery or be admissible in any criminal or civil proceeding. If available from other sources, however, such information and records shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the Team during a child death review. Further, the findings of the Team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form which shall not identify individuals. The portions of meetings in which individual child death cases are discussed by the Team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. In addition to the requirements of §

2.2-3712

, all team members, persons attending closed team meetings, and persons presenting information and records on specific child deaths to the Team during closed meetings shall execute a sworn statement to honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during any closed meeting to review a specific child death. Violations of this subsection are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Upon notification of a child death, any state or local government agency maintaining records on such child or such child’s family which are periodically purged shall retain such records for the longer of 12 months or until such time as the State Child Fatality Review Team has completed its child death review of the specific case.

The Team shall compile annual data which shall be made available to the Governor and the General Assembly as requested. These statistical data compilations shall not contain any personally identifying information and shall be public records.

History.

1994, c. 643; 1995, c. 499; 1999, cc. 703, 726; 2004, c. 690; 2007, c. 411; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2014, c. 583; 2017, c. 778.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 499, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be implemented to the extent possible within available resources or with such additional funding as may be provided in the appropriation act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 164, cl. 1 provides: “§ That the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner of the Department of Health shall convene a work group to develop a plan for establishing a Fetal and Infant Mortality Review Team (the Team) to (i) examine medical, social, and other related information regarding fetal and infant deaths in the Commonwealth to facilitate broad quantitative analyses as well as in-depth qualitative reviews of fetal and infant deaths in the Commonwealth to identify and investigate correlating factors that influence fetal and infant mortality; (ii) develop policy and programmatic recommendations to address the circumstances that may negatively impact fetal and infant health and improve services, systems of care, and resources for women, infants, and families; and (iii) work with communities and partners to implement such policy and programmatic recommendations and create actionable processes of change. Such plan may include:

“1. Methods for collecting information about fetal and infant deaths in the Commonwealth, including the collection of information about fetal deaths occurring after 20 weeks’ gestation and deaths of children under the age of 12 months as feasible, for broad statistical analysis;

“2. Criteria for the selection of deaths for investigation and review;

“3. Criteria for the selection of deaths for which additional voluntary investigation and qualitative review beyond that to which every death selected for review is subject. Such additional investigation and qualitative review may include interviews with biological or adoptive parents, stepparents, or legal guardians of the fetus or infant, members of the family of the fetus or infant, and other persons with information about the fetus or infant; reviews of circumstances and factors surrounding the fetal or infant death; and other investigative research;

“4. Procedures necessary for maintaining necessary confidentiality and security with regard to reviews undertaken by the Team;

“5. A five-year plan for initiation and operation of the Team, which may include (i) identification of necessary staff and equipment, (ii) identification of annual goals for the Team, (iii) provisions for coordination among stakeholders, (iv) identification of sources of funding available to support and sustain the Team, and (v) a proposed annual budget for each year; and

“6. Any recommendations for further study, legislative actions, or implementation of the Team.

“The work group shall be composed of the Chief Medical Examiner, the Director of the Office of Family Health, the State Registrar of Vital Records, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Commissioner of the Department of Social Services, and the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services or their designees, and (a) the Presidents of the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Chapter of the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology, the Virginia Chapter of the American Association of Pediatrics, and the Virginia Affiliate of the American College of Nurse-Midwives, or their designees; (b) the Director of the Virginia Neonatal Perinatal Collaborative or his designee; (c) representatives of community stakeholders such as doulas, local nonprofit organizations, mental health treatment providers, and other community stakeholders; (d) representatives of medical professionals with experience in fetal, infant, or maternal health; and (e) staff and members of such state agencies as may be appropriate.

“The work group shall report its findings and provide the plan to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and Education and Health by December 1, 2021.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “18” for “eighteen” in subsection A; substituted “16” for “sixteen” in subsection B; substituted “9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “A 54 of §

2.2-3705

” in subsection C; and substituted “12” for “twelve” in subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 411 inserted the present third sentence in subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsection A, inserted “in this section” and deleted “hereinafter” following “Review Team” in the first sentence; deleted “Virginia Sudden Infant Death Syndrome Alliance” following “Virginia Pediatric Society” in the last sentence of subsection B; in subsection C, inserted “Office of the” throughout the subsection, and substituted “attorney for the Commonwealth” for “Commonwealth’s Attorney” and “are” for “shall be” near the end; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 9 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection C.